Utah statutes.
20A-14-203.   Becoming a member of a local board of education -- Declaration of candidacy -- Election.

(1)  An individual may become a candidate for a local school board by filing a declaration of candidacy with the county clerk and paying the fee as required by Section 20A-9-202.

(2) (a)  The term of office for an individual elected to a local board of education is four years, beginning on the first Monday in January after the election.

(b)  A member of a local board of education shall serve until a successor is elected or appointed and qualified.

(c)  A member of a local board of education is "qualified" when the member takes or signs the constitutional oath of office.

